Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7418.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 32.2
UNIVERSITY OF RHODE ISLAND SCHOOLS OF MEDICINE AND DENTISTRY
16-32.2-1. Establishment.
There are hereby established within the University of Rhode Island a school of medicine
and a school of dentistry, each of which shall be academic units of the University of Rhode Island.
16-32.2-2. Purpose.
The purposes of the schools of medicine and dentistry shall be to:
(1) Provide professional education and training in medicine and dentistry to meet the health
care workforce needs of the state;
(2) Improve access to medical and dental care for the residents of Rhode Island, including
underserved populations;
(3) Support research, public health initiatives, and community-based clinical education;
(4) Promote collaboration with hospitals, health systems, dental clinics, and other health-
related institutions.
16-32.2-3. Authority to confer degrees.
The University of Rhode Island is authorized to confer, through its schools of medicine

and dentistry:
(1) The degree of Doctor of Medicine (M.D.);
(2) The degree of Doctor of Dental Surgery (D.D.S.) or Doctor of Dental Medicine
(D.M.D.); and
(3) Such other graduate or professional degrees as may be approved by the board of trustees
of the University of Rhode Island and the council on postsecondary education.
16-32.2-4. Governance.
(a) The schools of medicine and dentistry shall be subject to the governance, management,
and control of the board of trustees of the University of Rhode Island, consistent with applicable
law.
(b) Each school shall be administered by a dean, appointed by the president of the
University of Rhode Island with the approval of the board of trustees.
16-32.2-5. Accreditation.
(a) The University of Rhode Island shall seek and maintain accreditation:
(1) For the school of medicine, by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education (LCME)
or its successor;
(2) For the school of dentistry, by the Commission on Dental Accreditation (CODA) or its
successor.
(b) No students shall be matriculated into a professional degree program unless the
applicable accrediting body has authorized matriculation under its standards.
16-32.2-6. Clinical education and affiliation agreements.
(a) The University of Rhode Island is authorized to enter into affiliation agreements with
hospitals, health systems, dental clinics, community health centers, and other entities for purposes
including, but not limited to:
(1) Clinical education and clerkships;
(2) Residency and post-graduate training;
(3) Appointment of clinical faculty;
(4) Joint research and public service activities.
(b) Individuals employed by affiliated entities may hold academic appointments at the
University of Rhode Island, subject to policies of the board of trustees.
16-32.2-7. Faculty practice plans.
(a) The board of trustees may establish or designate one or more faculty practice plans,
including nonprofit entities, for the administration of professional clinical services provided by
faculty of the schools of medicine and dentistry.
LC003609 - Page 2 of 4

(b) Revenues generated through faculty practice plans established or designated pursuant
to subsection (a) of this section may be retained by the University of Rhode Island and used to
support the educational, clinical, and research missions of the schools.
16-32.2-8. Funding.
The general assembly may appropriate funds for the planning, establishment, operation,
and maintenance of the schools of medicine and dentistry, including accreditation, faculty
recruitment, facilities, and student support.
16-32.2-9. Capital development.
Facilities for the schools of medicine and dentistry shall be subject to the state capital
development process and may be financed through appropriations, bonds approved by the voters,
or other lawful means.
16-32.2-10. Rules and regulations.
The board of trustees of the University of Rhode Island may adopt rules and regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003609
========
LC003609 - Page 3 of 4